Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 9 Miscellaneous Provisions

15-23.1-901.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2006, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1.

15-23.1-902.
Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to proceedings begun on or after the effective date of this act to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 3.

15-23.1-903.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15.

15-23.1-904.
Effective date.

This chapter, as amended, takes effect July 1, 2015.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2006, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 132, § 1.

15-23.1-905.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 2, effective July 9, 2011.

15-23.1-906.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2000, ch. 266, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 455, § 1, effective July 7, 2006. For present comparable provisions, see §

15-30-1

.

15-23.1-907.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 2, effective July 9, 2011.

15-23.1-908.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 266, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 455, § 1, effective July 7, 2006. For present comparable provisions, see §

15-30-2

.